Louisiana, session 2026, HB1048.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:401.1(C), 1309(A)(1)(a)(ii) and (b)(ii), (2), and (4), and 1400.8
are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 18:1309(A)(1)(c) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§401.1. Election emergency; purpose; elections emergency contingency plan
* * *
C. If any delays or suspensions are authorized by the governor, the delayed
qualifying, early voting or election day voting shall resume or be rescheduled as soon
thereafter as is practicable. If the early voting period is suspended, one day of early
voting shall be added to the early voting period for each day of early voting that is
suspended as provided in R.S. 18:1309. In the event If the voting on election day is
delayed or suspended and early voting has been completed prior to the issuance of
the executive order delaying or suspending election day voting, early voting for the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1419 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1048
rescheduled election day may be reopened upon authorization of the governor for a
reasonable time prior to the new election date. Notice of the delay or suspension and
rescheduling of the election day or early voting shall be published at least once in a
newspaper of general circulation in the affected area if time permits and, where
practicable, broadcast as a public service announcement on radio and television
stations, or by any other means of communication available at that time.
* * *
§1309. Early voting; verification
A.(1)(a)
* * *
(ii) The period for conducting early voting shall also include the any day
added pursuant to Subparagraph (b) or (c) of this Paragraph, if applicable.
(b)
* * *
(ii) The additional day shall be the first day preceding the period described
in Item (a)(i) of this Paragraph that is not a Sunday or a holiday required to be
observed pursuant to Paragraph (4) of this Subsection.
(c) One day of early voting shall be added to the period specified in Item
(a)(i) of this Paragraph for each day of early voting that is suspended due to a state
of emergency or impending emergency pursuant to R.S. 18:401.1.
(2)(a) During the early voting period, the registrar shall maintain regular
office hours, remaining remain open from 8:30 a.m. to 6:00 p.m. Monday through
Saturday each day, including Saturday and Sunday. Early voting on each day of the
early voting period shall terminate when all persons who were in line to vote at the
close of the regular office hours of the registrar's office, as provided in this
Paragraph, have been allowed to vote.
(b) If the secretary of state determines that the office space of the registrar
is insufficient or inconvenient to accommodate early voting, the registrar may
provide for an alternate location to conduct early voting, which location shall be in
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1419 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1048
an accessible and conveniently located public facility within the parish, and in such
case, adequate notice shall be posted at the registrar's office informing the public of
the location where early voting is being conducted.
* * *
(4) A registrar shall observe the holidays which are provided by law or
proclaimed by the governor for state departments during any period for conducting
early voting. For purposes of this Section, Sundays and Saturdays shall not be
considered holidays provided by law.
* * *
§1400.8. Expenses incurred by registrars of voters conducting early voting; payment
by secretary of state
Election expenses incurred by a registrar of voters and his permanent
employees to perform election duties and responsibilities associated with early
voting on any day during the week between 4:30 p.m. and the time that early voting
terminates that day and on any Saturday or Sunday on which early voting is
conducted shall be paid by the state from funds appropriated to the secretary of state
for that purpose.